Maine, session 132, LD1206.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §694, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 623, §1, is amended
to read:
A. Notwithstanding section 661, upon proof in a form satisfactory to the bureau, unless
a municipality chooses reimbursement under paragraph B, a municipality that has
accepted a valid exemption under this subchapter is entitled to recover from the State
the applicable percentage of property tax revenue lost by reason of the exemption.
Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the applicable percentage is:
(1) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2008, 100%;
(2) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2009, 90%;
(3) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2010, 80%;
(4) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2011, 70%;
(5) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2012, 60%; and
(6) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2013 and for subsequent tax years
prior to April 1, 2026, 50%.;
(7) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2026, 60%;
(8) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2027, 70%;
(9) For property tax years beginning April 1, 2028 and April 1, 2029, 75%; and
(10) For property tax years beginning on or after April 1, 2030, 80%.